Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
PROHIBITED CONDUCT

Revision Note

Sections 291E-61 to 291E-65 renumbered pursuant to
§23G-15(1).

§291E-61 Operating a vehicle under the
influence of an intoxicant. (a) A person commits the offense of operating
a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant if the person operates or
assumes actual physical control of a vehicle:

(1) While under the influence of alcohol in an amount
sufficient to impair the person's normal mental faculties or ability to care
for the person and guard against casualty;

(2) While under the influence of any drug that
impairs the person's ability to operate the vehicle in a careful and prudent
manner;

(3) With .08 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred
ten liters of breath; or

(4) With .08 or more grams of alcohol per one hundred
milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood.

(b) A person committing the offense of
operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant shall be sentenced
without possibility of probation or suspension of sentence as follows:

(1) For the first offense, or any offense not
preceded within a five-year period by a conviction for an offense under this
section or section 291E-4(a):

(A) A fourteen-hour minimum substance abuse
rehabilitation program, including education and counseling, or other comparable
program deemed appropriate by the court;

(B) One-year revocation of license and
privilege to operate a vehicle during the revocation period and installation
during the revocation period of an ignition interlock device on any vehicle operated
by the person;

(C) Any one or more of the following:

(i) Seventy-two hours of community service
work;

(ii) Not less than forty-eight hours and not
more than five days of imprisonment; or

(iii) A fine of not less than $150 but not more
than $1,000;

(D) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the neurotrauma special fund; and

(E) A surcharge, if the court so orders, of
up to $25 to be deposited into the trauma system special fund;

(2) For an offense that occurs within five years of a
prior conviction for an offense under this section or section 291E-4(a):

(A) Revocation for not less than eighteen
months nor more than two years of license and privilege to operate a vehicle
during the revocation period and installation during the revocation period of
an ignition interlock device on any vehicle operated by the person;

(B) Either one of the following:

(i) Not less than two hundred forty hours of
community service work; or

(ii) Not less than five days but not more than
thirty days of imprisonment, of which at least forty-eight hours shall be
served consecutively;

(C) A fine of not less than $500 but not more
than $1,500;

(D) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the neurotrauma special fund; and

(E) A surcharge of up to $50 if the court so
orders, to be deposited into the trauma system special fund;

(3) For an offense that occurs within five years of
two prior convictions for offenses under this section or section 291E-4(a):

(A) A fine of not less than $500 but not more
than $2,500;

(B) Revocation for two years of license and
privilege to operate a vehicle during the revocation period and installation
during the revocation period of an ignition interlock device on any vehicle
operated by the person;

(C) Not less than ten days but not more than
thirty days imprisonment, of which at least forty-eight hours shall be served
consecutively;

(D) A surcharge of $25 to be deposited into
the neurotrauma special fund; and

(E) A surcharge of up to $50 if the court so
orders, to be deposited into the trauma system special fund;

(4) In addition to a sentence imposed under
paragraphs (1) through (3), any person eighteen years of age or older who is
convicted under this section and who operated a vehicle with a passenger, in or
on the vehicle, who was younger than fifteen years of age, shall be sentenced
to an additional mandatory fine of $500 and an additional mandatory term of
imprisonment of forty-eight hours; provided that the total term of imprisonment
for a person convicted under this paragraph shall not exceed the maximum term
of imprisonment provided in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), as applicable.
Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), the revocation period for a person
sentenced under this paragraph shall be not less than two years; and

(5) If the person demonstrates to the court that the
person:

(A) Does not own or have the use of a vehicle
in which the person can install an ignition interlock device during the
revocation period; or

(B) Is otherwise unable to drive during the
revocation period,

the person shall be absolutely prohibited from
driving during the period of applicable revocation provided in paragraphs (1)
to (4); provided that the court shall not issue an ignition interlock permit
pursuant to subsection (i) and the person shall be subject to the penalties
provided by section 291E-62 if the person drives during the applicable
revocation period.

(c) Except as provided in sections 286-118.5
and 291E-61.6, the court shall not issue an ignition interlock permit to:

(1) A defendant whose license is expired, suspended,
or revoked as a result of action other than the instant offense;

(2) A defendant who does not hold a valid license at
the time of the instant offense;

(3) A defendant who holds either a category 4 license
under section 286-102(b) or a commercial driver's license under section
286-239(a), unless the ignition interlock permit is restricted to a category 1,
2, or 3 license under section 286-102(b); or

(4) A defendant who holds a license that is a learner's
permit or instruction permit.

(d) Except as provided in subsection (c), the
court may issue a separate permit authorizing a defendant to operate a vehicle
owned by the defendant's employer during the period of revocation without
installation of an ignition interlock device if the defendant is gainfully
employed in a position that requires driving and the defendant will be
discharged if prohibited from driving a vehicle not equipped with an ignition
interlock device.

(e) A request made pursuant to subsection (d)
shall be accompanied by:

(1) A sworn statement from the defendant containing
facts establishing that the defendant currently is employed in a position that
requires driving and that the defendant will be discharged if prohibited from
driving a vehicle not equipped with an ignition interlock device; and

(2) A sworn statement from the defendant's employer
establishing that the employer will, in fact, discharge the defendant if the
defendant is prohibited from driving a vehicle not equipped with an ignition
interlock device and identifying the specific vehicle and hours of the day, not
to exceed twelve hours per day, the defendant will drive for purposes of
employment.

(f) A permit issued pursuant to subsection (d)
shall include restrictions allowing the defendant to drive:

(1) Only during specified hours of employment, not to
exceed twelve hours per day, and only for activities solely within the scope of
the employment;

(2) Only the vehicle specified; and

(3) Only if the permit is kept in the defendant's
possession while operating the employer's vehicle.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, any:

(1) Conviction under this section, section 291E-4(a),
or section 291E-61.5;

(2) Conviction in any other state or federal
jurisdiction for an offense that is comparable to operating or being in
physical control of a vehicle while having either an unlawful alcohol
concentration or an unlawful drug content in the blood or urine or while under
the influence of an intoxicant or habitually operating a vehicle under the
influence of an intoxicant; or

(3) Adjudication of a minor for a law violation that,
if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation of this section or an
offense under section 291E-4(a), or section 291E-61.5,

shall be considered a prior conviction for the
purposes of imposing sentence under this section. Any judgment on a verdict or
a finding of guilty, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or an adjudication,
in the case of a minor, that at the time of the offense has not been expunged
by pardon, reversed, or set aside shall be deemed a prior conviction under this
section. No license and privilege revocation shall be imposed pursuant to this
section if the person's license and privilege to operate a vehicle has previously
been administratively revoked pursuant to part III for the same act; provided
that, if the administrative revocation is subsequently reversed, the person's
license and privilege to operate a vehicle shall be revoked as provided in this
section. There shall be no requirement for the installation of an ignition
interlock device pursuant to this section if the requirement has previously
been imposed pursuant to part III for the same act; provided that, if the
requirement is subsequently reversed, a requirement for the installation of an
ignition interlock device shall be imposed as provided in this section.

(h) Whenever a court sentences a person
pursuant to subsection (b), it also shall require that the offender be referred
to the driver's education program for an assessment, by a certified substance
abuse counselor, of the offender's substance abuse or dependence and the need
for appropriate treatment. The counselor shall submit a report with
recommendations to the court. The court shall require the offender to obtain
appropriate treatment if the counselor's assessment establishes the offender's
substance abuse or dependence. All costs for assessment and treatment shall be
borne by the offender.

(i) Upon proof that the defendant has:

(1) Installed an ignition interlock device in any
vehicle the defendant operates pursuant to subsection (b); and

(2) Obtained motor vehicle insurance or
self-insurance that complies with the requirements under either section
431:10C-104 or section 431:10C-105,

the court shall issue an ignition interlock permit
that will allow the defendant to drive a vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device during the revocation period.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, whenever a court revokes a person's driver's license pursuant to this
section, the examiner of drivers shall not grant to the person a new driver's
license until the expiration of the period of revocation determined by the
court. After the period of revocation is completed, the person may apply for
and the examiner of drivers may grant to the person a new driver's license.

(k) Any person sentenced under this section
may be ordered to reimburse the county for the cost of any blood or urine tests
conducted pursuant to section 291E-11. The court shall order the person to
make restitution in a lump sum, or in a series of prorated installments, to the
police department or other agency incurring the expense of the blood or urine
test. Except as provided in section 291E-5, installation and maintenance of
the ignition interlock device required by subsection (b) shall be at the
defendant's own expense.

(l) As used in this section, the term "examiner
of drivers" has the same meaning as provided in section 286-2. [L 2000, c
189, pt of §23; am L 2001, c 157, §25; am L 2002, c 160, §11; am L 2003, c 71,
§3; am L 2004, c 90, §12; am L 2005, c 33, §1 and c 194, §1; am L 2006, c 201,
§7; am L 2007, c 198, §4; am L 2008, c 171, §§8, 16, 20 and c 231, §17; am L
2009, c 11, §17 and c 45, §§1, 2 as superseded by c 88, §§6, 13, 17(2); am L
2010, c 166, §19; am L 2012, c 327, §21; am L 2014, c 72, §7]

Case Notes

As to the description of the offense, this section, which
relates to operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant,
substantially reenacted §291-4.4, which pertained to the offense of habitually
driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs. 106 H. 480, 107
P.3d 409.

Where indictment charged defendant under §291-4.4, the
statute that was in effect at the time of defendant's arrest, there was no ex
post facto problem. 106 H. 480, 107 P.3d 409.

Where the five-year time period omitted from the oral charge
was a critical part of the subsection (b)(2) attendant circumstance, especially
in light of defendant's several prior DUI convictions, the oral charge was
defective and defendant's oral motion to dismiss should have been granted. 112
H. 269 (App.), 145 P.3d 812.

Because a prior conviction, as described in subsection (b)(2)
(2003), is an elemental attendant circumstance, intrinsic to the offense of
operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant, it was necessary that
defendant's prior conviction be alleged in the charging instrument and proven
at trial as preconditions to defendant's present conviction of operating a
vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant for the second time within five
years, in violation of subsections (a) and (b)(2) (2003). 114 H. 227, 160 P.3d
703 (2007).

Considerations of due process continue to require that the
aggravating factors set forth in subsection (b) - all of which remain "attendant
circumstances that are intrinsic to and 'enmeshed' in the hierarchy of offenses
that this section as a whole describes" - be alleged in the charging
instrument and proven beyond a reasonable doubt at trial. 114 H. 227, 160 P.3d
703 (2007).

The 2003 amendment to this section transformed subsection
(b)(1) to (3) into status offenses. 114 H. 227, 160 P.3d 703 (2007).

Where complaint charging defendant with a violation of this
section was silent with respect to the attendant circumstance of any prior
conviction, complaint was insufficient as a matter of law in charging a
violation of subsections (a) and (b)(2) (2003). 114 H. 227, 160 P.3d 703
(2007).

Although prosecution's oral charge failed to adequately set
forth the essential elements of the offense described by subsections (a) and
(b)(2) (2004), absent the phrase "for your second offense", the
prosecution's oral charge set forth the essential elements of the included
offense described by subsections (a) and (b)(1) (2004); thus, as record
contained sufficient evidence that defendant committed the offense of operating
a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant under subsections (a) and (b)(1)
(2004), case remanded for entry of judgment and resentencing under subsections
(a) and (b)(1) (2004). 114 H. 411, 163 P.3d 1148 (2007).

Where prosecution failed to present sufficient foundational
evidence for either the REA blood alcohol chemical testing procedure or the
Abbott AxSYM testing instrument used to perform defendant's blood alcohol test,
prosecution failed to prove beyond a reasonable doubt as required under this
section that defendant was operating a vehicle with .08 or more grams of
alcohol per one hundred milliliters or cubic centimeters of blood; appeals
court thus erred in affirming district court's admission into evidence of
defendant's test results without a proper foundation. 121 H. 274, 218 P.3d 762
(2009).

Although the oral charge tracked the language of this
section, where the charge failed to allege that defendant was driving
defendant's vehicle upon a public way, street, road, or highway at the time of
the offense, the charge was deficient, as the term "operate" as
defined in §291E-1 did not comport with its commonly understood definition,
required the conduct to take place "upon a public way, street, road, or
highway", and was neither "unmistakable" nor "readily
comprehensible to persons of common understanding". 121 H. 383, 219 P.3d
1170 (2009).

Section 291E-1 establishes an attendant circumstance of the
offense of operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant (OVUII),
i.e., that the defendant's conduct occur "upon a public way, street, road,
or highway"; the definition of "operate" in §291E-1 refers
generally to the conduct of "operating" a vehicle under the influence
as described in the title of this section, whether the conduct consists of
driving the vehicle or otherwise assuming actual physical control of it; thus,
the operation of a vehicle on a public way, street, road, or highway is an
attendant circumstance of the offense of OVUII and therefore an element of the
offense. 121 H. 383, 219 P.3d 1170 (2009).

An appellate court's remand for entry of judgment of
conviction and resentencing for a lesser-included offense must be based on a
jurisdictionally valid lesser-included charge; where defendant's charge under §291E-61.5
did not adequately allege the lesser-included offense of operating a vehicle
under the influence of an intoxicant as a first offender under this section because
the charge failed to allege an essential element, specifically, the attendant
circumstance that defendant operated a vehicle on a public road, way, street,
or highway, the appellate court did not err in vacating and remanding circuit
court case. 126 H. 475, 273 P.3d 1161 (2012).

A charge of operating a vehicle under the influence of an
intoxicant (OVUII) under subsection (a)(1) must allege the requisite mens rea
in order to fully define the offense in unmistakable terms readily comprehensible
to persons of common understanding, whereas an OVUII charge under subsection
(a)(3) is an absolute liability offense for which mens rea need not be alleged
or proven. 127 H. 48, 276 P.3d 617 (2012).

As the distinction between general and specific intent has
been abandoned, appellate court erred in relying on general intent cases to
hold that mens rea may be inferred from the allegations in an operating a
vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant charge under subsection (a)(1).
127 H. 48, 276 P.3d 617 (2012).

A prior judgment of acquittal on a subsection (a)(3) method
of proof in an operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant trial
is "in form only", but it serves as a factual finding that the State
has not met its burden of proving breath alcohol content. As such, the
collateral estoppel principle embodied in the double jeopardy clause of article
I, §10 of the Hawaii constitution and article V of the U.S. Constitution
prohibits the State from re-litigating breath alcohol content, whether in a
re-prosecution of defendant on the subsection (a)(3) method of proof, or as
part of the State's evidence in a subsequent trial on the subsection (a)(1)
method of proof. 129 H. 146, 296 P.3d 359 (2013).

Where it was undisputed that the complaint against defendant
failed to allege a mens rea and, therefore, was insufficient to charge a
violation of subsection (a)(1), on remand, the charge under subsection (a)(1)
should be dismissed without prejudice. 131 H. 1, 313 P.3d 690 (2013).

Where the written submission of plea form in which defendant
entered a plea of no contest solely to the subsection (a)(1) method of proof,
was silent regarding subsection (a)(3), and the hearing transcript revealed
some ambiguity as to the State's and district court's understandings of the
plea, the court construed the State as having given up its ability to prosecute
defendant under subsection (a)(3) in exchange for defendant's conditional plea
under subsection (a)(1); in these circumstances, permitting the State to
prosecute defendant under subsection (a)(3) would allow the State to avoid its
end of the bargain, and would thereby violate defendant's due process rights.
131 H. 1, 313 P.3d 690 (2013).

The oral charge for operating a vehicle under the influence
of an intoxicant was defective because it omitted the requisite state of mind
of intentional, knowing, or reckless. 131 H. 215, 317 P.3d 659 (2013).

Complaint was not insufficient for failing to allege a mens
rea where complaint alleged all the essential elements of the charged operating
a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant offense and provided the
defendant with fair notice of the offense charged; with respect to the
violation of subsection (a)(3), the violation is an absolute liability offense
that does not require proof of mens rea, and with respect to the violation of
subsection (a)(1), mens rea is not an essential element of that violation and
could be inferred from the allegations in the complaint. 125 H. 232 (App.),
257 P.3d 245 (2011).

Full retroactive application of the Wheeler rule, i.e., the
holding that an operating a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant
(OVUII) charge is deficient if it charges in the language of subsection (a)
without specifically alleging the public-road element, to cases on collateral
review was not warranted; limited or pipeline retroactive effect was sufficient
and appropriate. Moreover, appellant had not shown that the deficiency in the
OVUII charge entitled appellant to relief on collateral review. 131 H. 153
(App.), 315 P.3d 779 (2013).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next